04_Morphology/rus.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Morpheme boundary
%<n%>                ! Noun
%<sg%>               ! Singular
%<pl%>               ! Plural
%<nom%>              ! Nominative
%<gen%>              ! Genitive
%<dat%>              ! Dative
%<acc%>              ! Accusative
%<ins%>              ! Instrumental
%<pre%>              ! Preposition
%{h%}                ! hardness
%{g%}                ! hardness

LEXICON Root

POS ;

LEXICON POS

%<n%>: NounStems ;

LEXICON N

%<sg%>: SG ;
%<pl%>: PL ;

LEXICON SG

%<nom%>: я # ;
%<gen%>: и # ;
%<dat%>: и # ;
%<acc%>: ю # ;
%<ins%>: ей # ;
%<pre%>: и # ;

LEXICON PL

%<nom%>: и # ;
%<gen%>: й # ;
%<dat%>: ям # ;
%<acc%>: и # ;
%<ins%>: ями # ;
%<pre%>: ях # ;

LEXICON NounStems

фантази:фантази N ; ! 
галакти:галакти N ; !
симпати:симпати N ; !
гармони:гармони N ; !
академи:академи N ; !
экспедици:экспедици N ; !
мелоди:мелоди N ; !
дипломати:дипломати N ; !
демократи:демократи N ; !
манипуляци:манипуляци N ; !
фотографи:фотографи N ; !
реакци:реакци N ; !
компози:компози N ; !
эмоци:эмоци N ; !
амнисти:амнисти N ; !
коллекци:коллекци N ; !
революци:революци N ; !
федераци:федераци N ; !
иллюзи:иллюзи N ; !
професси:професси N ; !
